Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.110

Model policy and procedure for students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders.

By December 15, 2021, the Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall adopt a model policy and procedure that school districts may use to implement the requirements of RCW 28A.210.355. The model policy and procedure must be periodically reviewed by the Washington state school directors' association and may be revised as necessary.

[ 2021 c 29 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was directed to be codified in chapter 28A.235 RCW, but placement in chapter 28A.345 RCW appears to be more appropriate.